Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201247-621
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Community Corrections Act:

(1) Community correctional facility or program means a community-based
or community-oriented facility or program which (a) is operated either by
the state or by a contractor which may be a unit of local government or a
nongovernmental agency, (b) may be designed to provide residential accommodations
for adult offenders, (c) provides programs and services to aid adult offenders
in obtaining and holding regular employment, enrolling in and maintaining
participation in academic courses, participating in vocational training programs,
utilizing the resources of the community to meet their personal and family
needs, obtaining mental health, alcohol, and drug treatment, and participating
in specialized programs that exist within the community, and (d) offers community
supervision options, including, but not limited to, drug treatment, mental
health programs, and day reporting centers;

(2) Director means the executive director of
the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice;

(3) Division
means the Community Corrections Division of the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice;

(4) Nongovernmental
agency means any person, private nonprofit agency, corporation, association,
labor organization, or entity other than the state or a political subdivision
of the state; and

(5) Unit of local government means a county, city, village,
or entity established pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 33;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 6.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.